Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.070

Liquidator's powers.

The liquidator, upon the approval of the court, may sell, discount, or compromise debts of the association and claims against its debtors. The liquidator, with the approval of the court, may lease, operate, repair, exchange, or sell, either for cash or upon terms, the real and personal property of the association.

The liquidator, with the approval of the court, when funds are available, may pay savings members whose balances amount to not more than five dollars, the full amount of the balances.

Checks issued or payments held by the liquidator which remain undelivered for six months following the final liquidation dividend shall be deposited with the director, after which the liquidator shall be discharged by the court. During ten years thereafter, the director shall deliver the checks or payments, or the director's own checks in lieu thereof, to the payee, or his or her legal representative, upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the payee's right thereto. After the ten years, the director shall cancel all such checks or payments remaining in the director's possession and issue a check against the account for the amount thereof, payable to the state treasurer, and deliver it to the state treasurer. Such payment shall escheat to the state, without further legal proceedings.

[ 1994 c 92 s 459; 1982 c 3 s 69; 1953 c 71 s 10; 1945 c 235 s 108; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-227. Prior: 1935 c 171 s 4; 1933 c 183 ss 70, 73, 74, 78.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.